Utah statutes.
76-10-1233.   Content providers -- Material harmful to minors.

(1)  A content provider that is domiciled in Utah, or generates or hosts content in Utah, shall restrict access to material harmful to minors.

(2)  If the attorney general determines that a content provider violates Subsection (1), the attorney general shall:

(a)  notify the content provider that the content provider is in violation of Subsection (1); and

(b)  notify the content provider that the content provider has 30 days to comply with Subsection (1) or be subject to Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  If a content provider intentionally or knowingly violates this section more than 30 days after receiving the notice provided under Subsection (2), the content provider is subject to a civil fine of $2,500 for each separate violation of Subsection (1), up to $10,000 per day.

(b)  A proceeding to impose the civil fine under this section may be brought only by the state attorney general and shall be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction.

